Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-615
Ordinances; passage; rules and regulations; proof.

All ordinances of a city of the second class or village shall be passed pursuant to such rules and regulations as the city council or village board of trustees may provide. All such ordinances may be proved by the certificate of the city clerk or village clerk, under the seal of the city or village.

Laws 1879, § 69, XXX, p. 217;

Laws 1881, c. 23, § 8, XXX, p. 185;

Laws 1885, c. 20, § 1, XXX, p. 176;

Laws 1887, c. 12, § 1, XXX, p. 305;

R.S.1913, § 5155;

C.S.1922, § 4330;

C.S.1929, § 17-521;

R.S.1943, § 17-615;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 214.

Where ordinance in question is printed in pamphlet form by authority of the city or village, it is entitled to be read and received as evidence in all courts. Village of Deshler v. Southern Nebraska Power Co., 133 Neb. 778, 277 N.W. 77 (1938).